South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5060.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1. SECTION 4 of Act 369 of 1959, as last amended by Act 727 of 1978, is further amended to read: SECTION 4. The district shall be governed by the St. John's Fire Commission which shall consist of sevennine qualified electors of the district, four of whom shall be residents of Johns Island, one of whom shall be a resident of Seabrook Island, one of whom shall be a resident of Wadmalaw Island, and onethree of whom shall be a residentresidents of Kiawah Island.  The members shall be appointed by the Governor, upon the recommendation of the majority of the county legislative delegation, for terms of four years and until their successors are appointed and qualifyqualified. All terms shall expire December thirty-first in the appropriate year. The members shall elect a chairman and a secretary from its membership.  Vacancies shall be filled in the manner of the original appointment for the unexpired portion of the term only. SECTION 2. SECTION 8 of Act 369 of 1959, as last amended by Act 413 of 2002, is further amended to read: SECTION 8. The commission shall adopt a procurement code in compliance with Section 11-35-5320 and all records must be available as a public record pursuant to Section 30-4-30may procure any products or services it requires in an amount not exceeding one thousand dollars at a fair and reasonable price without the requirement for soliciting bids. For such procurements in excess of one thousand dollars but not exceeding ten thousand dollars, the commission must secure three quotes by telephone, fax, or other means without the requirement for soliciting bids through a formal request for proposals (RFP) and then choose the most cost-effective and responsive bid. For such procurements in excess of ten thousand dollars, the commission must solicit bids through a formal request for proposals (RFP) and then accept the most cost-effective and responsive bid. A permanent record shall be kept by the commission of all its proceedings, contracts, and other matters done and performed by it, including an accurate plan of the work done, and proper books shall be kept, showing in detail all monies and funds received and disbursed by it. The books of the commission shall be audited annually, and at such other times as the Supervising Auditor of Charleston County shall direct, by a certified public accountant and a copy of the audit filed with the county council. All books and records of the commission shall be open at all reasonable times to the inspection of any citizen of the district. SECTION 3. SECTION 2 of Act 727 of 1978 is repealed. SECTION 4.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----